Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-641
Counterfeit airbags; act, how cited.

Sections 28-641 to 28-644 shall be known and may be cited as the Counterfeit Airbag Prevention Act.

Laws 2019, LB7, § 2.